Nebraska, session 109, LB889.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-2118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2118 All licenses or registrations issued under the State Electrical
Act shall expire on December 31 of each even-numbered year. All license or
registration applications shall include the applicant's social security number.
The board shall, by a unanimous vote of the board, set reasonable fees for
examination, issuance, and renewal of licenses and registrations issued under
the State Electrical Act in amounts necessary to cover the costs incurred by
the State Electrical Division and the board in administering and carrying out
the purposes of the State Electrical Act and in a manner that unnecessary
surpluses are avoided. The board shall annually file a report with the Attorney
General and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst stating the amount of the fees set
by the board. Such reports shall be submitted on or before July 1 of each year.
The report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted
electronically. The board shall establish the following fees:
(1) For examination for the following licenses:
(a) Electrical contractor;
(b) Journeyman electrician;
(c) Residential journeyman electrician;
(d) Fire alarm installer; and
(e) Special electrician license, sixty dollars;
(2) For each year of the two-year license period for issuance and renewal
of the following licenses:
(a) Electrical contractor; and
(b) Journeyman electrician, residential journeyman electrician, fire alarm
installer, or special electrician;
(3) For each year of the two-year registration period for issuance and
renewal as an apprentice electrician; and
(4) For renewal on or after September 9, 1993, of the following licenses
issued prior to such date for each year of the two-year license period:
(a) Class B electrical contractor;
(b) Class A master electrician; and
(c) Class B journeyman electrician.
The holder of a an expired license or registration may renew the license
or registration beginning October 1 through November 31 of even-numbered years
upon payment of the license or registration fee. The holder of a license or
registration during the late renewal period may renew the license or
registration from December 1 through December 31 of even-numbered years, for a
period of three months from the date of expiration upon payment of the license
or registration fee plus ten percent of the renewal fee for each month or
portion thereof past the expiration date. All holders of expired licenses or
registrations expired for more than three months shall apply for a new license
or registration.
Sec. 2. Section 81-2143, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-2143 (1) It shall be a Class IV felony to I misdemeanor knowingly and
willfully to commit or to order, instruct, or direct another to commit any of
the following acts:
(a) (1) To make a false statement in any license application, request for
inspection, certificate, or other lawfully authorized or required form or
statement provided by the State Electrical Act;
(b) (2) To perform electrical work for another without a proper license
for such work while claiming to have such license;
(c) (3) To fail to file a request for inspection when required;
(d) (4) To interfere with or refuse entry to an inspector lawfully engaged
in the performance of his or her duties; or
(e) (5) To fail or neglect to comply with the act or any lawful rule,
regulation, or order of the board.
(2) Subdivision (1)(b) of this section shall not be construed to prohibit
a person from performing electrical work for such person's parent, stepparent,
spouse, descendant, grandparent, brother, sister, cousin, uncle, or aunt,
whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption or marriage without a
license.
Sec. 3. Original sections 81-2118 and 81-2143, Reissue Revised Statutes
of Nebraska, are repealed.
-1-